Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 49 Management Of Assets
28-49-111. Debt of executor.

Nomination in a will of any person as executor shall not operate as a discharge or bequest of any right of action which the testator had against the executor, but the right of action, if it survives, shall be included in the inventory among the assets of the decedent.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 93; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2303.

28-49-112. Continuation of business.

Unless a testator shall otherwise direct by his or her last will and testament, a personal representative shall have authority to continue any business in which the decedent may have been engaged at the time of death for a period not exceeding one (1) month following the date of the granting of letters of administration without obtaining an order of the court, and, if the business is that of conducting farming operations, he or she may so continue the farming operations for a period of three (3) months or until the end of the calendar year in which the death of the decedent occurred, whichever shall be the longer.

Thereafter, upon petition of the personal representative, the court may order the further continuance of the operation of the business, if not a farming operation, by the personal representative for an additional period not to exceed three (3) months, and for an additional period not to exceed one (1) year if it is a farming operation.

The petition shall set forth the reasons why the petitioner believes the business should be further continued and a brief financial statement of the operation of the business by the petitioner.

The court may from time to time further continue the period during which the business may be so operated. However, no one (1) continuance shall be for a period exceeding three (3) months if a non-farming operation or one (1) year for a farming operation.

The personal representative shall not have the authority to bind the estate beyond the last period during which the business was authorized to be continued.

The estate, but not the personal representative personally, shall be liable for damages resulting from torts or other acts committed by agents and employees of the estate in the course of their employment.

It is specifically recognized that the operation of any business undertaking involves hazard, chance, and danger of loss. In recognition of this fact, it is declared to be the legislative intent that no personal representative shall be held personally liable for loss resulting from mere lack of familiarity with the business operations, mistake of judgment made in good faith, or like causes.

Ark. L. Rev.

Haught, 1988 Update to the Arkansas Probate System: An Overview of Recent Developments in Arkansas Probate Practice, 42 Ark. L. Rev. 631.

Where business was continued by an administrator or executor, trade creditors could not resort to the general assets of the estate for the purpose of reimbursement or payment; rather, their remedies were confined to the assets embarked in the trade or business. State ex rel. Altheimer v. Hunter, 56 Ark. 159, 19 S.W. 496 (1892) (decision under prior law).

Cited: In re Estate of Spann, 257 Ark. 857, 520 S.W.2d 286 (1975); Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 103; 1985, No. 1007, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2410.

28-49-113. Power to borrow money.

Upon a showing that such an action will be advantageous to the estate, the court may authorize the personal representative to borrow money, to execute notes and other legal evidences of indebtedness, and to mortgage property of the estate in accordance with the provisions of §§28-51-201 and28-51-301.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 104; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2411.

28-49-114. Performance of decedent's contracts of sale.

When a decedent shall have entered into a contract for the conveyance of real property or sale of specific personal property which was not performed during his or her lifetime, the court, upon petition of the personal representative, the purchaser, or other interested person, if it finds that the decedent, if he or she had lived, could have been required to make the conveyance or consummate the sale, shall direct the personal representative to execute the deed of conveyance or the bill of sale pursuant to the terms of the original contract. The conveyance or bill of sale shall have the same effect to pass the title or interest of the decedent as if made by him or her personally.

If the contract requires the giving of warranties, the deed or bill of sale to be given by the personal representative shall contain the warranties required.

The warranties shall be binding on the estate as though made by the decedent but shall not bind the personal representative personally.

A certified copy of the order authorizing the execution of the instrument may be recorded with the deed or bill of sale in the office of the recorder for the county where the property is situated and shall be prima facie evidence of the due appointment and qualification of the personal representative, the correctness of the proceedings, and the authority of the personal representative to make the conveyance.

To convey land there had to be a valid executory contract made by the decedent before a probate court could order specific performance, and jurisdiction would not be presumed. Oliver v. Routh, 123 Ark. 189, 184 S.W. 843 (1916) (decision under prior law).

In a suit by mortgagor against the administrator of mortgagee to compel conveyance of certain lands which mortgagee had purchased at trustee's sale, evidence of agreement that mortgagor should have an extension of time to pay the mortgage debt or should have the right to redeem or repurchase, and contract was made before expiration of time within which redemption might have been effected from trustee's sale, warranted a decree for the plaintiff. Wood v. Conner, 205 Ark. 582, 170 S.W.2d 997 (1943) (decision under prior law).

An executor could not create a new liability where none existed before by binding an estate upon an unaccepted subscription which was ineffectual because it had not been accepted during the subscriber's lifetime. Blanton v. Forrest City Mfg. Co., 138 Ark. 508, 212 S.W. 330 (1919) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 105; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2412.

28-49-115. Investment of funds.

Subject to his or her primary duty to preserve the estate for prompt distribution and to the terms of the will, if any, the personal representative, whenever it is reasonable to do so, shall invest the funds of the estate and make them productive. The investments shall be restricted to those permitted to guardians by the Probate Code.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 106; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2413.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

28-49-116. Bank deposits.

A personal representative may, and when ordered by the court shall, deposit, as a fiduciary, the funds of the estate in a bank or banks of this state, as a general deposit, either in a checking account or a savings account.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 107; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2414.